Utah statutes.
9-8-701.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Board" means the Board of State History.
(2)  "Division" means the Division of State History.
(3)  "Endowment fund" means any history endowment fund created under this part
by a qualifying organization.
(4)  "Qualifying organization" means any Utah nonprofit history organization
or local government that qualifies under this chapter to create an endowment
fund, receive state money into the endowment fund, match state money deposited
into the endowment fund, and expend interest earned on the endowment fund.
(5)  "State fund" means the Utah History Endowment Fund created under Section
9-8-702.
